North Carolina statutes. Chapter 73. Mills.
Article 1. Public Mills.

§ 73-1.
Public mills defined.

Every grist or grain mill, however powered or operated, which grinds for toll is a public mill.

History.

1777, c. 122, s. 1; R.C., c. 71, s. 1; Code, s. 1846; Rev., s. 2119; C.S., s. 2531; 1947, c. 781.

§ 73-2.
Miller to grind according to turn; tolls regulated.

All millers of public mills shall grind according to turn, and shall well and sufficiently grind the grain brought to their mills, if the water will permit, and shall take no more toll for grinding than one-eighth part of the Indian corn and wheat, and one-fourteenth part for chopping grain of any kind; and every miller and keeper of a mill making default therein shall, for each offense, forfeit and pay five dollars ($5.00) to the party injured: Provided, that the owner may grind his own grain at any time.

History.

1777, c. 122, s. 10; 1793, c. 402; R.C., c. 71, s. 6; Code, s. 1847; 1905, c. 694; Rev., s. 2120; 1907, c. 367; C.S., s. 2532.

Local Modification.

Bertie: 1933, c. 150; Chowan: 1937, c. 4; Cleveland: 1933, c. 158; Franklin: 1929, c. 129; Hertford: 1933, c. 150; Hyde: 1933, c. 150; Lenoir: 1929, c. 139; Northampton: 1929, c. 129; Pamlico: 1929, c. 311; Pender: 1933, c. 298; Robeson: 1929, c. 311; Sampson: 1937, c. 164.

§ 73-3.
Measures to be kept; tolls by weight or measure.

All millers shall keep in their mills the following measures, namely, a half bushel and peck of full measure, and also proper toll dishes for each measure; but the toll allowed by law may be taken by weight or measure at the option of the miller and customer.

History.

1777, c. 122, s. 11; R.C., c. 71, s. 7; Code, s. 1848; 1885, c. 202; Rev., s. 2121; C.S., s. 2533.

§ 73-4.
Keeping false toll dishes misdemeanor.

If any owner, by himself or servant, keeping any mill, shall keep any false toll dishes, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1777, c. 122, s. 11; R.C., c. 71, s. 7; Code, s. 1848; Rev., s. 3679; C.S., s. 2534; 1993, c. 539, s. 552; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).